Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LIVESTOCK MRNA ASSESSMENT.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to develop, in consultation with the University of Minnesota Veterinary Medical Center or other agreed upon research entities and the commissioner of health, a fact- and science-based assessment of the risks and benefits associated with mRNA treatments for livestock, including current commercial use, if any, and any current public research trials. No later than January 15, 2026, the commissioner must submit the assessment and any corresponding policy recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture. new text end